Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0974.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1261. As used in this chapter: (a) "Affordable care act" means the patient protection and affordable care act, Public Law 111-148, as amended by the health care and education reconciliation act of 2010, Public Law 111-152. (b) "Business entity" means a corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other legal entity. (c) "Certificate" means a document issued by the director authorizing a person to act as a navigator or certified application counselor for the qualifications specified in the document. The certificate itself does not create any actual, apparent, or inherent authority in the certificate holder to represent or commit an insurer. (d) "Certificate holder" means a person issued a certificate under this chapter. (e) "Certified application counselor" means an individual who is certified as a certified application counselor under this chapter and is authorized by the United States department of health and human services Department of Health and Human Services to perform the duties described in 45 CFR 155.225. (f) "Certified navigator" means a person that is certified as a navigator under this chapter. (g) "Exchange" means an American health benefits exchange established or operating under the affordable care act.marketplace as that term is defined in section 103 of the Michigan health insurance exchange act. (h) "Insurance" means any of the kinds of insurance described in chapter 6. (i) "Insurance producer" means a person required to be licensed under the laws of this state to sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance. (j) "Navigator" means a person that receives any funding from an exchange or the federal government and is designated or selected by an exchange or the federal government to perform any of the duties described in 42 USC 18031(i)(3). (k) "Negotiate" means the act of conferring directly with or offering advice directly to a purchaser or prospective purchaser of a particular contract of insurance concerning any of the substantive benefits, terms, or conditions of the contract, provided that if the person engaged in that act either sells insurance or obtains insurance from insurers for purchasers. (l) "Qualified health plan" means that term as defined in section 1301 of the affordable care act.42 USC 18021. (m) "Sell" means to exchange a contract of insurance by any means, for money or its equivalent, on behalf of an insurance company. (n) "Solicit" means attempting to sell insurance or asking or urging a person to apply for a particular kind of insurance from a particular company. Sec. 1262. (1) Beginning June 30, 2015, an individual shall not act as a navigator unless he or she has filed an application under section 1263(1) and is certified with this state as a navigator. (2) Unless certified as a navigator, an individual shall not receive funding from an exchange. (3) Subject to the affordable care act, a certified navigator shall do all of the following: (a) Conduct public education activities to raise awareness of the availability of qualified health plans. (b) Distribute fair and impartial information concerning enrollment in all qualified health plans offered within the exchange and the availability of the premium tax credits under section 36B of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 36B, and cost-sharing reduction under section 1402 of the affordable care act. (c) Facilitate selection of a qualified health plan. (d) Provide referrals to appropriate state agencies for an enrollee with a grievance, complaint, or question regarding the enrollee's health plan , or coverage , or a determination under such the plan coverage. (e) Provide information in a manner that is culturally and linguistically appropriate to the needs of the population served by the exchange. (4) A certified navigator shall not do any of the following: (a) Sell, solicit, or negotiate health insurance. (b) Recommend a particular health benefit plan.insurance policy. (c) Provide any information or services related to insurance regulated under this act other than health benefit plans insurance policies or other products offered in the exchange. (5) If an exchange is operational in this state, the director shall determine whether a program to certify and train navigators protects the privacy and security of personally identifiable information of the residents of this state under the laws of this state. If the director determines that the program does not protect the residents of this state under this subsection, the director shall do all of the following: (a) Establish a certification and training program that must include, but is not limited to, all of the following: (i) A criminal history check using the department of state police's internet criminal history access tool (ICHAT). (ii) Training on privacy and security of personal identifying information, training on ethics, training on provisions of the affordable care act relating to navigators and certified application counselors, and any necessary state-specific training as determined by the director. (b) Develop an application and disclosure form by which an applicant for a certificate shall disclose any potential conflicts of interest, as well as any other information required by the director. (c) Submit an annual report to the standing committees of the senate and house of representatives with jurisdiction over health policy. The report must include all of the following: (i) The director's assessment of any federal program to certify and train navigators and certified application counselors. (ii) Any changes implemented by the department as a result of a federal program to train navigators and certified application counselors. Sec. 1262a. (1) An individual shall not act as a certified application counselor unless he or she has filed an application under section 1263(2) and is certified with this state as a certified application counselor. (2) Unless certified as a certified application counselor, an individual shall not receive funding from an exchange. (3) Subject to the affordable care act, a certified application counselor may do all of the following: (a) Conduct public education activities to raise awareness of the availability of qualified health plans. (b) Distribute fair and impartial information about all qualified health plans offered within the exchange and the availability of the premium tax credits under section 36B of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 36B, and cost-sharing reduction under section 1402 of the affordable care act. (c) Assist individuals applying for coverage in a qualified health plan. (d) Facilitate selection of eligible individuals in a qualified health plan. (e) Provide information in a manner that is culturally and linguistically appropriate to the needs of the population served by the exchange. (f) Refer an individual with limited English proficiency to a navigator, insurance producer, or other source of assistance. (4) A certified application counselor shall not do any of the following: (a) Sell, solicit, or negotiate health insurance. (b) Recommend a particular qualified health benefit plan or health insurance policy. (c) Provide any information or services related to insurance regulated under this act other than qualified health benefit plans or other products offered in the exchange. (5) Before providing services to or acting for an individual under subsection (3), a certified application counselor shall disclose any potential conflict of interest to the individual. Sec. 1264. (1) In addition to any other powers under this act, the director may place on probation, suspend, or revoke a certificate or may levy a civil fine under section 1270, or take any combination of actions, and the director shall refuse to issue a certificate under section 1263, for any 1 or more causes that would be a ground for refusal, suspension, or revocation of an insurance producer's license under section 1239. The director may revoke a certificate of a person or refuse to issue a certificate for a person that receives financial compensation, including monetary and in-kind compensation, gifts, or any compensation related to enrollment from an insurer offering qualified health benefits plans through an exchange operating in this state. The director may deny, suspend, approve, renew, or revoke a certificate if the director considers it necessary to protect insureds and the public. (2) The certificate of a business entity may be suspended, revoked, or refused if the director finds, after hearing, that an individual certificate holder's violation was known or should have been known by 1 or more of the partners, officers, or managers acting on behalf of the business entity and the violation was neither reported to the director nor corrective action taken. (3) The director may examine the books and records of a certificate holder to determine whether the certificate holder is conducting its business in accordance with this chapter. For the purpose of facilitating the examination, the certificate holder shall allow the director free access, at reasonable times, to all of the certificate holder's books and records relating to transactions to which this chapter applies. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 973 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.